Hawaii statutes.
[§141-34] Reports.
(a) At least seven days prior to harvest, each industrial hemp licensee shall
file a report with the board that includes documentation that the licensee has
entered into a purchase agreement with an industrial hemp processor. If the
licensee has not entered into such an agreement, the licensee shall include a
statement of intended disposition of its industrial hemp crop.

(b) Licensees shall report any subsequent
changes to the purchase agreement or disposition statement to the board within
ten days of the change.

(c) Two business days prior to the movement of
the industrial hemp grain or plant material from the permitted location, the
licensee shall submit to the board an application for movement permit. The
application shall include the mode and location to which the product is to be
transported. An inspection of the product may occur prior to movement. [L
2016, c 228, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next